apertium-ckt.ckt.twol
"Glottal stop after cns before vowels"
%{ʔ%}:ъ <=> [:Cns - ԓ - ч ] ([ :0 | :%> ]) ([ :0 | :%> ]) _ ([ :0 | :%> ]) ([ :0 | :%> ]) :Vow ;

"Glottal stop after ԓ and ч"
%{ʔ%}:ь <=> [ ԓ | ч ] ([ :0 | :%> ]) ([ :0 | :%> ]) _ ([ :0 | :%> ]) ([ :0 | :%> ]) :Vow ;

"Glottal stop symbol deletion"
ʼ:0 <=> :Cns [ :ъ | :ь ] ([ :0 | :%> ]) ([ :0 | :%> ]) :Vow _ ;


! this dsnt work :(
! "к allophone г"
! к:г <=> _ [ :Cns - :Back ] ;
!       except
!             _ ([ : - %>: ]) %{☭%}: ;

! "Non-coronal cluster transformation"
